src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_kalved_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../..//generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kalveđ: # MLO checked
    kalveđ+V+Inf: kalveđ
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kalvam
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kalvah
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kalva
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kalveen
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kalvevettee
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kalvev
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kalvep
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kalvevetteđ
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kalveh
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kolvim
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kolvih
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: koolvij
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kolvijm
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kolvijd
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kolvijn
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: koolvijm
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: koolvijd
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kolvii
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: kalvaččim
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: kalvaččih
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: kalvaččij
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: kalvaččáim
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: kalvaččáid
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: kalvaččáin
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: kalvaččijm
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: kalvaččijd
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: kalvaččii
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: kalveem
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: kalveeh
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: koolviš
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: kolvižeen
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: koolvišvettee
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: kolvižává
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: kolvižep
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: koolvišvetteđ
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: kolvižeh
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kalve
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kalvos
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kalvoon
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kalvee
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kalvoos
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kalvoop
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kalveđ
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kalvoos
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kalve
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kalvam
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: kalvaččii
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: kalvaa
    kalveđ+V+PrsPrc: kalvee
    kalveđ+V+PrfPrc: kalvam
    kalveđ+V+Actio+Nom: kalvem
    kalveđ+V+Actio+Ess: kalvemin
    kalveđ+V+Actio+Loc: kalvemist
    kalveđ+V+Actio+Ill: kalvemân
    kalveđ+V+Ger: kalvedijn
    kalveđ+V+VAbess: kalvehánnáá
